lib/dict/bs_BA.dic
anticipirati/C
asocirati/C
blebetati/C
blije¹tati/A
bljeskati/B
bljuvati/E
bojati/A
brojati/A
brujati/A
bubnjati/A
buèati/A
centrirati/C
crtati/B
cvrèati/A
èerupati/B
èuèati/A
æaskati/B
æutati/A
darivati/C
demistifikovati/C
diplomirati/C
dobijati/B
doèuti/D
dodavati/E
dogovarati/B
dokazati/C
doliti/D
dopasti/A
dopunjati/B
dotjecati/C
dozrijevati/B
drhtati/A
dr¾ati/A
eksplodirati/C
fiksirati/C
funkcionisati/C
gaðati/B
gomilati/B
grgotati/C
gu¾vati/B
huèati/A
hvastati/B
implementirati/C
inspirisati/C
isijeèem/D
iskazivati/C
iskopèati/B
ispasti/A
ispisati/C
ispostavljati/B
ispucati/B
istrèati/A
istrèavati/C
istrugati/B
i¹èe¹ljati/B
izazivati/B
izbiti/D
izbrojati/A
izdati/D
izdavati/E
izdr¾ati/A
izgraðivati/C
izgrizati/B
izliti/D
izmijenjati/B
iznenaðivati/C
izribati/B
izuti/D
izvikivati/C
izvi¾dati/A
izvolevati/B
jeèati/A
karati/B
kazati/C
kleèati/A
klimati/B
kljuvati/E
kmeèati/A
kombinovati/C
konkretizovati/C
kopirati/C
koprcati/B
kriti/D
kri¾ati/B
kuvati/B
lakirati/C
legnem/D
le¾ati/A
ljubakati/B
magistrirati/C
malaksati/B
milovati/C
motati/B
motivisati/C
muèati/A
nabiti/D
nabrajati/B
nabrojati/A
naèuti/D
nadijevati/B
nadjesti/A
nad¾ivjeti/C
nagomilati/B
namazati/C
namje¹tati/B
napasti/A
napravljati/B
nasijeèem/D
nasljedovati/C
nastati/D
nastojati/A
nasukati/B
naviti/D
navraæati/B
na¾uljati/D
negodovati/C
nestati/D
obeæati/B
obezbjeðivati/C
obiti/D
oboljeti/C
obuhvaæati/B
obuti/D
oèaravati/C
oèe¹ljati/B
odati/D
odavati/E
odbijati/B
odbiti/D
odlijetati/C
odliti/D
odlivati/B
odr¾ati/A
odsijeèem/D
odsjesti/A
odstupati/B
odustati/D
odu¹evljavati/C
odviti/D
odzvanjati/B
olak¹ati/B
olak¹avati/C
opasti/A
opiti/D
opjevati/B
opkoraèivati/C
oprobati/B
opsjesti/A
op¹iti/D
ordinirati/C
oslikati/B
osposobljavati/C
ostati/D
ote¾ati/B
othranjivati/C
otkriti/D
otkrivati/B
otpasti/A
otrèati/A
otrovati/C
oviti/D
ovladati/B
parcelisati/C
peèem/D
peru¹ati/B
pikirati/C
pi¹tati/A
plju¹tati/A
pljuvati/E
pobiti/D
pobjeðivati/C
poboljevati/B
pobrojati/A
podjarmljivati/C
podlijevati/B
podozrijevati/E
podr¾ati/A
podsijeèem/D
podstrekavati/C
pogledati/B
pojeftinjivati/C
pokopati/B
pokriti/D
politi/D
polizati/C
pomi¹ljati/B
pomognem/D
pomrèati/A
popiti/D
poravnati/D
poremeæivati/C
porezati/D
posijeèem/D
posjedati/B
poslu¾ivati/C
postati/D
postojati/A
potaknuti/D
poticati/C
potkapati/B
potkazati/A
potpasti/A
potrèati/A
potvrðivati/C
pouzdati/D
poviti/D
povraæati/B
poznavati/E
po¾urivati/C
prebiti/D
preèuti/D
preæutati/A
predavati/E
predisponirati/C
predstojati/A
preduzimati/B
prekriti/D
preletjeti/C
prele¾ati/A
prelijevati/B
prepasti/A
preplavljivati/C
prepoznavati/E
preprodavati/E
preraèunati/B
presaviti/D
presijeèem/D
prestati/D
pretjerivati/C
pretrèati/A
preuvelièati/B
previti/D
pre¾ivljivati/C
pribrojati/A
pridati/D
pridavati/E
pridobiti/D
pridodati/B
pridr¾ati/A
prikriti/D
primirisati/C
pripadati/B
pripasti/A
pripomognem/D
prispijem/D
pristizati/C
pristojati/A
pri¹iti/D
pritrèati/A
priznavati/E
probijati/B
probiti/D
procesirati/C
proèuti/D
prodavati/E
programirati/C
prohuèati/A
prohujati/A
proisteknem/D
proizvesti/B
proliti/D
promuækati/B
propagirati/C
propasti/A
propiti/D
propljuvati/E
prosvjeæivati/C
pro¹iti/D
protrèati/A
protrljati/B
prozreo/C
prozujati/A
pr¹tati/A
puzati/A
raèvati/B
rashlaðivati/C
rasijeèem/D
raskriti/D
raspasti/A
rasplamsati/B
raspoznavati/E
rasprostro/C
ra¹èinjati/B
ra¹èuti/D
razaznavati/E
razbiti/D
razdavati/E
razgovarati/B
razgranièavati/C
razliti/D
razonoðavati/C
razotkriti/D
razraèunati/B
razumijem/D
razviti/D
recitovati/C
reintepretirati/C
reknem/D
reskirati/C
re¾ati/A
robovati/C
sabijati/B
sabiti/D
sadr¾ati/A
sahranjivati/C
sakriti/D
saliti/D
sasijeèem/D
saslu¹ati/B
sastojati/A
sa¹iti/D
saviti/D
savladavati/C
saznavati/E
sazriti/D
sijeèem/D
simplificirati/C
sisati/B
sjesti/A
skraæivati/C
skupljati/B
sliti/D
smrskati/B
snabdijem/C
spasti/A
spopasti/A
sporazumijem/D
spoticati/C
spoznavati/E
sprdati/B
startovati/C
stati/D
stojati/A
stradati/B
strèati/A
strujati/A
studirati/C
suzbiti/D
su¾avati/C
svaðati/B
svuèem/D
¹evrdati/B
¹i¹tati/A
¹iti/D
¹kakljati/A
¹krgutati/C
¹kripati/A
¹u¹tati/A
tapetirati/C
teèem/D
tepati/B
tièem/D
ti¹tati/A
trèati/A
trebovati/C
trkati/B
tuèem/D
ubiti/D
uèestvovati/C
ugaðati/B
ugro¾avati/C
ukrasti/B
ulijetati/C
uliti/D
umrljati/B
uni¹tavati/C
upasti/A
upiti/D
upljuvati/E
upoznavati/E
useljavati/C
uspesti/A
uspijevati/B
ustati/D
u¹utati/A
utrèati/A
uturati/B
uvidjeti/C
uzdr¾ati/A
valjati/B
vidjeti/C
vrebati/B
vri¹tati/A
vuèem/D
zablje¹tati/A
zaèuti/D
zadr¾ati/A
zaduvati/B
zahladnjeti/C
zahuèati/A
zajeèati/A
zakuvati/B
zaliti/D
zapasti/A
zapetljati/B
zapisati/C
zapi¹tati/A
zaposjesti/A
zasijecati/B
za¹iti/D
za¹kripati/A
za¹u¹tati/A
zatrèati/A
zatreptati/C
zavesti/B
zavriti/D
zazveèati/A
zazvi¾dati/A
zazvuèati/A
znadem/D
znati/B
zujati/A
zveèati/A
zvi¾dati/A
zvrèati/A
zvuèati/A
¾rtvovati/C
